Florida, session 2026, HB165.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb165-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 165 2026
Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Correctional and
Probation Officer Fairness Act."
Section 2. Compensation of correctional officers,
correctional probation officers, and institutional security
specialists.—
(1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Correctional officers, correctional probation
officers, and institutional security specialists are certified
by the Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission and
are held to the same professional standards as state law
enforcement officers.
(b) Correctional officers, correctional probation
officers, and institutional security specialists work in high-
risk environments and serve a vital role in public safety,
security, and offender supervision.
(c) There are disparities in compensation among
correctional officers, correctional probation officers, and
institutional security specialists and state law enforcement
officers.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to:
(a) Ensure that correctional officers, correctional
probation officers, and institutional security specialists
receive compensation consistent with that of state law
enforcement officers.
(b) Provide that the Governor may authorize emergency
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb165-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 165 2026
response roles for qualified correctional officers, correctional
probation officers, and institutional security specialists
during state or federal emergencies.
(c) Establish fair and consistent annual pay raises that
reflect economic realities.
(d) Guarantee permanent pay equity protection for
correctional officers, correctional probation officers, and
institutional security specialists.
(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2030, the average salary for
correctional officers, correctional probation officers, and
institutional security specialists may not be less than 97
percent of the average salary of sworn officers employed by law
enforcement agencies of this state, including the Florida
Highway Patrol, the Department of Law Enforcement, and the Fish
and Wildlife Conservation Commission.
(b) By July 1 of each year beginning in 2027, the
Department of Management Services shall submit an annual
compensation analysis report to the Governor, the President of
the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives to
measure progress toward the goal of this section and continued
compliance with this section.
(4)(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, and each
fiscal year thereafter, sworn law enforcement officers,
correctional officers, correctional probation officers, and
institutional security specialists shall receive an annual
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb165-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 165 2026
salary increase of at least 3 percent.
(b) The salary increase in paragraph (a) shall be made in
addition to any bonuses and merit, retention, or parity
increases separately authorized by law or policy.
Section 3. Subsections (9) through (12) of section 252.36,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (10) through
(13), respectively, and new subsection (9) is added to that
section to read:
252.36 Emergency management powers of the Governor.—
(9)(a) In the event of a declared state or federal
emergency, the Governor may issue an executive order for up to
60 days which authorizes correctional officers, correctional
probation officers, and institutional security specialists to
assist state or federal agencies, including, but not limited to,
the United States Department of Homeland Security and United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement in enforcement or
support operations.
(b) To be eligible for the authorization in paragraph (a),
a correctional officer, correctional probation officer, or
institutional security specialist must:
1. Be actively employed by the state.
2. Be certified by the Criminal Justice Standards and
Training Commission.
3. Have at least 5 years of continuous service in a full-
100 time capacity as a correctional officer, correctional probation
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb165-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 165 2026
101 officer, institutional security specialist, or sworn law
102 enforcement officer of this state.
103 (c) The Governor may renew an executive order issued under
104 this subsection in 30-day increments as necessary.
105 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb165-00